Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.360

State-employed religious coordinator—Housing allowance.

In the case of a minister or other clergyperson employed as a religious coordinator in a state institution or agency, there is designated in the salary or wage paid to the person an amount up to forty percent of the gross salary as either of the following:

(1) The rental value of a home furnished to the person as part of the person's compensation; or

(2) The housing/rental allowance paid to the person as part of the person's compensation, to the extent used by the person to rent or provide a home.

[ 2019 c 107 s 1; 1982 c 190 s 1.]

NOTES:

Appointment and duties of institutional chaplains: RCW 72.01.210 through 72.01.260.

Volunteer law enforcement chaplains: Chapter 41.22 RCW.